Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-180
Estray, defined.

Estray means any livestock found running at large upon public or private lands, either fenced or unfenced, whose owner is unknown in the area where found, any such livestock which is branded with a brand which is not on record in the office of the Nebraska Brand Committee, or any livestock for which ownership has not been established as provided in section 54-1,118.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 11.